Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF2293.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 5504SV (2) 91 sc/ns S.F. 2293 Section 1. Section 8A.707, subsection 2, paragraph b, Code 1 2026, is amended to read as follows: 2 b. Maintain a research centers center in Des Moines and Iowa 3 City . 4 Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE. This Act, being deemed of immediate 5 importance, takes effect upon enactment. 6